Washington statutes.
RCW 43.250.170

Separately managed state treasurer's service account.

A separately managed state treasurer's service account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The account is not subject to appropriation or allotment procedures. All moneys received from separately managed accounts for payment to the office of the state treasurer must be deposited into the separately managed state treasurer's service account. Expenditures from the separately managed state treasurer's service account may be made solely for the operation of the separately managed accounts investment program. Only the treasurer or the treasurer's designee may authorize expenditures from the separately managed state treasurer's service account.

[ 2019 c 163 s 6.]